North Carolina, session 2025, SB819.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) The General Assembly authorizes the Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources to add the First Broad River Trail in Cleveland and Rutherford Counties
between the River's head of navigation in Golden Valley in Rutherford County and the River's
*S819-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
confluence with the Broad River in Cleveland County to the State Parks System as a State Trail,
as provided in G.S. 143B-135.54(b).
SECTION 1.(b) The Department shall support, promote, encourage, and facilitate
the establishment of trail segments on State park lands and on lands of other federal, State, local,
and private landowners. On segments of those State Trails that cross property controlled by
agencies or owners other than the Department's Division of Parks and Recreation, the laws, rules,
and policies of those agencies or owners shall govern the use of the property.
SECTION 1.(c) The requirement of G.S. 143B-135.54(b) that additions be
accompanied by adequate appropriations for land acquisition, development, and operations shall
not apply to the authorization set forth in this section; provided, however, that the State may
receive donations of appropriate land and may purchase other needed lands for the First Broad
River State Trail with existing funds in the North Carolina Land and Water Fund, the Complete
the Trails Fund, the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, the federal Land and Water Conservation
Fund, and other available sources of funding.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated the sum of twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) in nonrecurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to the Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources for public education and system planning efforts related to the authorization
of the First Broad River Trail by this act.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act becomes effective July 1, 2026. The remainder of
this act is effective when it becomes law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 819-First Edition